Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201283-4,147
Report; contents.

An
annual progress report shall be provided electronically to
the Legislature ensuring that all programmatic objectives are being met. The
report shall include an evaluation of the impact of the multi-treatment programs,
including program costs, educational achievement, inmate disciplinary activity,
probation release decisionmaking, and community reintegration on November
1 of the year following implementation.

Laws 1997, LB 882, § 7;

Laws 2012, LB782, § 217.